Hawaii statutes.
§353-24 Conservators of committed persons,
appointed when. Whenever a person is sentenced to imprisonment for any
felony for a term exceeding one year, any judge having probate powers, upon
application, may appoint a conservator to have the care and management of the
committed person's estate, real and personal, during the term of imprisonment
or until the committed person is finally discharged from the sentence. The
letters of conservatorship shall be revoked by the pardon or final discharge of
the committed person, but the revocation shall not invalidate legal acts done
by the conservator. [L 1987, c 338, pt of §3; am L 2004, c 161, §11]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next